Maryland, session 2025, HB0617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
2–114.
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 9–602 of the Criminal Law Article and
subject to subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section, the Comptroller may monitor and
record incoming telephone calls to employees of the Comptroller’s call centers to telephones
within the offices of the Comptroller for training, quality control, and employee safety
purposes.
(b) Any monitored or recorded telephone call shall contain a notice to the
telephone caller that “Your call may be recorded or monitored for training and quality
control purposes”.
(c) (1) The Comptroller may record or monitor incoming calls to the
[automated call distribution system] COMPTROLLER’S CALL CENTERS only.
(2) The Comptroller may not record or monitor calls to or from direct
individual lines in the Office of the Comptroller.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information derived from an
incoming telephone call to employees of the Comptroller’s call centers may not be used in
any criminal or civil proceeding against any Maryland taxpayer unless the caller has made
a personal and imminent threat against an employee or property of the State.
– 1 –

Ch. 634 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) Recorded telephone calls may not be retained by the Office of the Comptroller
for longer than 60 days, except:
(1) if the call is to be used solely as a positive example to follow in the
training of employees using the Comptroller’s call centers; or
(2) if the caller has made a personal and imminent threat against an
employee or property of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –